Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2601
Quality Child Care Act, how cited.

Sections 43-2601 to 43-2625 shall be known and may be cited as the Quality Child Care Act.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 2.